Utah statutes.
58-28-308.   Provisions for current practitioners.

An individual who, as of August 1, 2006, is practicing as a veterinarian intern under supervision of a veterinarian licensed under this chapter shall receive a temporary license to practice in the state as a veterinary intern:

(1)  if, prior to August 1, 2006, the individual submits an application and any required fees to the division to obtain licensure under this chapter as a veterinary intern; and

(2)  while the application for licensure is pending with the division.

